Hawaii, session 2026, GM1114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 711-1121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (3) to read as follows:
"(3) Subsection (1) (a), (b) , (c) , (d) , and [-(^] (f) shall
not apply to any police officer, deputy sheriff, adult
corrections officer, correctional worker, or fire department
personnel acting within the course and scope of their duties, or
to any other person acting under the authority of, or pursuant
to a contract with, the United States or a state or county
government, or any department or agency of the United States or
a state or county government."
SECTION 2. Section 711-1123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows:
"(1) A person commits the offense of misuse of uncrewed
aircraft in the third degree if the person intentionally,
knowingly, or recklessly:
2026-1655 HB389 SDl SMA.docx
iiiHiuiiiiiiHiuiiimiinuiii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
hS,
S.D. 1
(a) Removes, obliterates, alters, or tampers with the
identification or registration number of an uncrewed
aircraft;
(b) Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby obstructs,
impairs, or hinders the performance of a police
officer, deputy sheriff, or fire department personnel
acting under color of their official authority;
(c) Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby causes
bodily injury to another person;
(d) Operates an uncrewed aircraft and thereby damages the
property of another, without the other's consent, in
an amount exceeding $750;
(e) Operates an uncrewed aircraft while under the
influence of an intoxicant;
(f) Operates an uncrewed aircraft after the person's
license, certificate, or privilege to operate an
uncrewed aircraft has been revoked, suspended, or
otherwise restricted by the issuing governmental
authority; or
(g) Uses an uncrewed aircraft in furtherance of the
commission of a felony[—] not otherwise listed,
2026-1655 HB389 SDl SMA.docx

Page 3 H.B. NO.
hSi
o.U. I
described, or enumerated in this section or sections
711-1121 or 711-1122.
A conviction and sentence under this subsection shall be in
addition to and not in lieu of any conviction and sentence for a
separate felony; provided that the sentence imposed under this
subsection may run concurrently or consecutively with the
separate felony."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-1655 HB389 SDl SMA.docx 3
imiiiiMiiiiiiiimiiiiiHiiii

H.B. NO.
hki
APPROVED this 19th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 389, HD 1, SD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 389, H.D. 1,S.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 10, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3654